Hawaii statutes.
§328-14 Drugs or devices deemed adulterated
when. A drug or device shall be deemed to be adulterated:

(1) (A) If it consists in whole or in part of any
filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance; or

(B) (i) If it has been produced, prepared, packed,
or held under insanitary conditions whereby it may have been contaminated with
filth, or whereby it may have been rendered injurious to health; or

(ii) If the methods used in, or the facilities
or controls used for, its manufacture, processing, packing, or holding do not
conform to or are not operated or administered in conformity with current good
manufacturing practice to assure that the drug or device meets the requirements
of this part as to safety and has the identity and strength, and meets the quality
and purity characteristics which it purports or is represented to possess; or

(C) If its container is composed, in whole or
in part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render the
contents injurious to health; or

(D) If:

(i) It bears or contains, for purposes of
coloring only, a color additive which is unsafe within the meaning of the
Federal Act; or

(ii) It is a color additive, the intended use
of which is for purposes of coloring only, and is unsafe within the meaning of
the Federal Act;

(2) If it purports to be or is represented as a drug
the name of which is recognized in an official compendium, and its strength
differs from, or its quality or purity falls below, the standard set forth in
the compendium. Such a determination as to strength, quality, or purity shall
be made in accordance with the tests or methods of assay set forth in the
compendium, or in the absence of or inadequacy of these tests or methods of
assay, those prescribed under authority of the Federal Act. No drug defined in
an official compendium shall be deemed to be adulterated under this paragraph
because it differs from the standard of strength, quality, or purity therefor
set forth in the compendium, if its difference in strength, quality, or purity
from that standard is plainly stated on its label. Whenever a drug is
recognized in both the United States Pharmacopoeia and the Homeopathic
Pharmacopoeia of the United States it shall be subject to the requirements of
the United States Pharmacopoeia unless it is labeled and offered for sale as a
homeopathic drug, in which case it shall be subject to the Homeopathic
Pharmacopoeia of the United States and not those of the United States
Pharmacopoeia;

(3) If it is not subject to paragraph (2) and its
strength differs from, or its purity or quality falls below, that which it
purports or is represented to possess;

(4) If it is a drug and any substance has been (A)
mixed or packed therewith so as to reduce its quality or strength; or (B)
substituted wholly or in part therefor. [L 1941, c 318, §10; RL 1945, §2214; RL
1955, §51-14; am L 1967, c 152, §8; HRS §328-14; am L 1995, c 6, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next